Nebraska, session 109, LB589.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB589 LB589
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1142, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1142 (1) Level I services refers to services provided to children
with disabilities who require an aggregate of not more than three hours
per week of special education services and support services and includes
all administrative, diagnostic, consultative, and vocational-adjustment
counselor services.
(2) The total allowable reimbursable cost for support services shall
not exceed a percentage, established by the State Board of Education, of
the school district's or approved cooperative's total allowable
reimbursable cost for all special education programs and support
services. The percentage established by the board for support services
shall not exceed the difference of ten percent minus the percentage of
the appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature set
aside for reimbursements for support services pursuant to subsection (5)
of this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, for
special education and support services provided in each school fiscal
year, the department shall reimburse each school district in the
following school fiscal year eighty percent of the total allowable excess
costs for all special education programs and support services.
Cooperatives of school districts or educational service units shall also
be eligible for reimbursement for cooperative programs pursuant to this
section if such cooperatives or educational service units have complied
with the reporting and approval requirements of section 79-1155 for
cooperative programs which were offered in the preceding school fiscal
year.
(4)(a) The payments shall be made by the department to the school
district of residence, cooperative of school districts, or educational
service unit each school year in a minimum of seven payments between the
fifth and twentieth day of each month beginning in December. Additional
-2-

LB589 LB589
2025 2025
payments may be made based upon additional valid claims submitted. The
State Treasurer shall, between the fifth and twentieth day of each month,
notify the Director of Administrative Services of the amount of funds
available in the General Fund and the Education Future Fund for payment
purposes. The director shall, upon receiving such certification, draw
warrants against such funds as appropriated.
(b) If the General Fund appropriations for special education
approved by the Legislature, minus the amounts set aside pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section, are insufficient to reimburse eighty
percent of the total allowable excess costs for all special education
programs and support services for any school fiscal year:
(i) Such allowable excess costs shall be reimbursed from the General
Fund appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature,
minus the amounts set aside pursuant to subsection (5) of this section,
on a pro rata basis at the maximum rate of reimbursement such
appropriations will allow as determined by the department; and
(ii) The remainder of the eighty percent reimbursement of such
allowable excess costs shall be paid from the Education Future Fund.
(5) Residential settings described in subdivision (10)(c) of section
79-215 shall be reimbursed for the educational services, including
special education services and support services, in an amount determined
pursuant to the average per pupil cost of the service agency.
Reimbursements pursuant to this section shall be made from funds set
aside for such purpose within sixty days after receipt of a reimbursement
request submitted in the manner required by the department and including
any documentation required by the department for educational services
that have been provided, except that if there are not any funds available
for the remainder of the state fiscal year for such reimbursements, the
reimbursement shall occur within thirty days after the beginning of the
immediately following state fiscal year. The department may audit any
required documentation and subtract any payments made in error from
-3-

LB589 LB589
2025 2025
future reimbursements. The department shall set aside separate amounts
from the appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature
for reimbursements pursuant to this subsection for students receiving
special education services and for students receiving support services
for each state fiscal year. The amounts set aside for each purpose shall
be based on estimates of the reimbursements to be requested during the
state fiscal year and shall not be less than the total amount of
reimbursements requested in the prior state fiscal year plus any unpaid
requests from the prior state fiscal year.
(6) For each school district that received a payment pursuant to the
Extraordinary Increase in Special Education Expenditures Act in the
school fiscal year for which special education expenditures were
reimbursed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, an amount equal to
such payment shall be subtracted from the reimbursement calculated
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and such amount shall be
transferred to the Education Future Fund.
(7) The allowable and reimbursable costs for special education and
support services shall include substitute service costs directly
associated with special education programs. Each school district shall
provide special education staff with four days of professional leave per
year, supported by substitute personnel. Such leave shall be used onsite
for the sole purpose of completing essential documentation for students
receiving special education services on such staff's caseload.
(8) (7) On or before November 15 of each year, the department shall
submit to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature,
and the Education Committee of the Legislature:
(a) The total allowable excess costs for all special education
programs and support services for all school districts, cooperatives of
school districts, and educational service units; and
(b) The total reimbursements requested pursuant to subsection (5) of
this section for the most recently completed school fiscal year.
-4-

LB589 LB589
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Original section 79-1142, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-5-